Washington statutes.
RCW 19.116.070

Nonparties assisting, causing, or arranging unlawful assignment or transfer.

(1) A person engages in an act of unlawful subleasing of a motor vehicle when the person is not a party to the lease contract or security agreement, and assists, causes, or arranges an actual or purported assignment as described in RCW 19.116.060.

(2) A dealer engages in an act of unlawful transfer of an ownership interest in a motor vehicle when the dealer is not a party to the security agreement, and assists, causes, or arranges an actual or purported transfer as described in RCW 19.116.050.

[ 1990 c 44 s 8.]